Washington statutes.
RCW 43.211.020

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Department" means the department of social and health services.

(2) "WIN 211" means the Washington information network 211, a 501(c)(3) corporation incorporated in the state of Washington.

(3) "Approved 211 service provider" means a public or nonprofit agency or organization designated by WIN 211 to provide 211 services.

(4) "211 service area" means an area of the state of Washington identified by WIN 211 as an area in which an approved 211 service provider will provide 211 services.

(5) "211" means the abbreviated dialing code assigned by the federal communications commission on July 21, 2000, for consumer access to community information and referral services.

[ 2003 c 135 s 3.]